Utah statutes.
53A-17a-125.   Appropriation for retirement and Social Security.

(1)  The employee's retirement contribution shall be 1% for employees who are under the state's contributory retirement program.

(2)  The employer's contribution under the state's contributory retirement program is determined under Section 49-12-301, subject to the 1% contribution under Subsection (1).

(3) (a)  The employer-employee contribution rate for employees who are under the state's noncontributory retirement program is determined under Section 49-13-301.

(b)  The same contribution rate used under Subsection (3)(a) shall be used to calculate the appropriation for charter schools described under Subsection (5).

(4) (a)  Money appropriated to the State Board of Education for retirement and Social Security money shall be allocated to school districts and charter schools based on a district's or charter school's total weighted pupil units compared to the total weighted pupil units for all districts in the state.

(b)  Subject to budget constraints, money needed to support retirement and Social Security shall be determined by taking the district's prior year allocation and adjusting it for:

(i)  student growth;

(ii)  the percentage increase in the value of the weighted pupil unit; and

(iii)  the effect of any change in the rates for retirement, Social Security, or both.

(5)  A charter school that has made an election of nonparticipation in the Utah State Retirement Systems in accordance with Section 53A-1a-512 and Title 49, Utah State Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act, shall use the funds described under this section for retirement to provide its own compensation, benefit, and retirement programs.

